Mississippi statutes. Title 93. Domestic Relations
Article 4. Establishment of Support Order or Determination of Parentage.

§ 93-25-401.
Establishment of support order.

If a support order entitled to recognition under this chapter has not been issued, a responding tribunal of this state with personal jurisdiction over the parties may issue a support order if:

The individual seeking the order resides outside this state; or

The support enforcement agency seeking the order is located outside this state.

Identified as the father of the child through genetic testing;

An alleged father who has declined to submit to genetic testing;

Shown by clear and convincing evidence to be the father of the child;

An acknowledged father as provided by applicable state law;

The mother of the child; or

An individual who has been ordered to pay child support in a previous proceeding and the order has not been reversed or vacated.

The tribunal may issue a temporary child-support order if the tribunal determines that such an order is appropriate and the individual ordered to pay is:

A presumed father of the child;

Petitioning to have his paternity adjudicated;

Upon finding, after notice and opportunity to be heard, that an obligor owes a duty of support, the tribunal shall issue a support order directed to the obligor and may issue other orders pursuant to Section 93-25-305.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 367, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 93-25-402.
Proceeding to determine parentage.

A tribunal of this state authorized to determine parentage of a child may serve as a responding tribunal in a proceeding to determine parentage of a child brought under this chapter or a law or procedure substantially similar to this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 367, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.